North Carolina, session 2025, HB813.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Effective January 1, 2026, Part 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 131D of the
General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Part 1. Licensing.
…
"§ 131D-2.1. Definitions.
As used in this Article:
…
(5) Assisted living residence. – Any group housing and services program for two
or more unrelated adults, by whatever name it is called, that makes available,
at a minimum, one meal a day and housekeeping services and provides
personal care services directly or through a formal written agreement with one
or more licensed home care or hospice agencies. The Department may allow
nursing service exceptions on a case-by-case basis. Settings in which services
are delivered may include self-contained apartment units or single or shared
room units with private or area baths. Assisted living residences are to be
distinguished from nursing homes subject to provisions of G.S. 131E-102.
There are three two types of assisted living residences: adult care homes,
homes and adult care homes that serve only elderly persons, and multiunit
*H813-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
assisted housing with services. persons. As used in this section, "elderly
person" means:
a. Any person who has attained the age of 55 years or older and requires
assistance with activities of daily living, housing, and services, or
b. Any adult who has a primary diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease or other
form of dementia who requires assistance with activities of daily
living, housing, and services provided by a licensed Alzheimer's and
dementia care unit.
…
(10) Multiunit assisted housing with services. – An assisted living residence in
which hands-on personal care services and nursing services which are
arranged by housing management are provided by a licensed home care or
hospice agency through an individualized written care plan. The housing
management has a financial interest or financial affiliation or formal written
agreement which makes personal care services accessible and available
through at least one licensed home care or hospice agency. The resident has a
choice of any provider, and the housing management may not combine
charges for housing and personal care services. All residents, or their
compensatory agents, must be capable, through informed consent, of entering
into a contract and must not be in need of 24-hour supervision. Assistance
with self-administration of medications may be provided by appropriately
trained staff when delegated by a licensed nurse according to the home care
agency's established plan of care. Multiunit assisted housing with services
programs are required to register annually with the Division of Health Service
Regulation. Multiunit assisted housing with services programs are required to
provide a disclosure statement to the Division of Health Service Regulation.
The disclosure statement is required to be a part of the annual rental contract
that includes a description of the following requirements:
a. Emergency response system;
b. Charges for services offered;
c. Limitations of tenancy;
d. Limitations of services;
e. Resident responsibilities;
f. Financial/legal relationship between housing management and home
care or hospice agencies;
g. A listing of all home care or hospice agencies and other community
services in the area;
h. An appeals process; and
i. Procedures for required initial and annual resident screening and
referrals for services.
Continuing care retirement communities, subject to regulation by the
Department of Insurance under Chapter 58 of the General Statutes, and
temporary family health care structures, as defined in G.S. 160D-915, are
exempt from the regulatory requirements for multiunit assisted housing with
services programs.
…
(12a) Registered residential facility. – A nonlicensed residence for two or more
unrelated adults, by whatever name it is called, in which the housing
management arranges for a licensed home care or hospice agency to provide
hands-on personal care services and nursing services to residents through an
individualized written care plan. Continuing care retirement communities,
Page 2 House Bill 813-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
subject to regulation by the Department of Insurance under Chapter 58 of the
General Statutes, and temporary family health care structures, as defined in
G.S. 160D-915, are not registered residential facilities for purposes of this
Part.
(13) Registration. – The submission by a multiunit assisted housing with services
provider of a disclosure statement containing all the information as outlined
in subdivision (10) of this section.
…
"§ 131D-2.2. Persons not to be cared for in adult care homes and multiunit assisted housing
with services; registered residential facilities; hospice care; obtaining
services.care services in assisted living residences; assisted living residents' right
to obtain other services at their own expense.
…
(b) Multiunit Assisted Housing With Services. Registered Residential Facilities. – Except
when a physician certifies that appropriate care can be provided on a temporary basis by an
appropriate licensed health care professional to meet the resident's needs and prevent unnecessary
relocation, multiunit assisted housing with services registered residential facilities shall not care
for individuals with any of the following conditions or care needs:
(1) Ventilator dependency;dependency.
(2) Dermal ulcers III and IV, except those stage III ulcers which are determined
by an independent physician to be healing;healing.
(3) Intravenous therapy or injections directly into the vein, except for intermittent
intravenous therapy managed by a home care or hospice agency licensed in
this State;State.
(4) Airborne infectious disease in a communicable state that requires isolation of
the individual or requires special precautions by the caretaker to prevent
transmission of the disease, including diseases such as tuberculosis and
excluding infections such as the common cold;cold.
(5) Psychotropic medications without appropriate diagnosis and treatment
plans;plans.
(6) Nasogastric tubes;tubes.
(7) Gastric tubes, except when the individual is capable of independently feeding
himself or herself and caring for the tube, or as managed by a home care or
hospice agency licensed in this State;State.
(8) Individuals requiring continuous licensed nursing care;care.
(9) Individuals whose physician certifies that placement is no longer
appropriate;appropriate.
(10) Unless the individual's independent physician determines otherwise,
individuals who require maximum physical assistance as documented by a
uniform assessment instrument and who meet Medicaid nursing facility
level-of-care criteria as defined in the State Plan for Medical Assistance.
Maximum physical assistance means that an individual has a rating of total
dependence in four or more of the seven activities of daily living as
documented on a uniform assessment instrument;instrument.
(10a) Individuals who, because of one or more physical or cognitive impairments,
are unable to evacuate from the registered residential facility independently
without physical or verbal assistance.
(10b) Individuals who exhibit wandering behaviors or who, because of one or more
cognitive impairments, require supervision to maintain their safety in the
registered residential facility.
House Bill 813-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(11) Individuals whose health needs cannot be met in the specific multiunit assisted
housing with services registered residential facility as determined by the
residence; andfacility.
(12) Such other medical and functional care needs as the Medical Care
Commission determines cannot be properly met in multiunit assisted housing
with services.a registered residential facility.
…
"§ 131D-2.2A. Requirements for registered residential facilities; compliance with
disclosure statement; Department's right to inspect.
(a) Registration. – Registered residential facilities shall apply annually for registration
with the Division of Health Service Regulation (Division) on forms and in the manner prescribed
by the Division. The Division shall approve registration for any registered residential facility that
meets all of the requirements of this section and pays the registration fee required by
G.S. 131D-2.5(b).
(b) Disclosure Statement. – In order to be approved for registration by the Division, a
registered residential facility shall provide a disclosure statement with its completed registration
application that includes a description of all of the following items, services, and requirements:
(1) The facility's emergency response system and an explanation of how the
resident should call for emergency assistance.
(2) Charges for rentals or services offered by the facility, which shall not be
changed without at least 30 days' written notice to residents.
(3) Any limitations of tenancy.
(4) Any limitations of services, including any services not provided by the
registered residential facility and procedures for initiating termination of a
rental contract due to changes in a resident's condition or due to other reasons.
(5) Resident responsibilities.
(6) Any financial or legal relationship between the housing management and any
licensed home care or hospice agencies referred by the housing management
to residents.
(7) A listing of all licensed home care and hospice agencies and other community
services located in the same area as the facility and their contact information.
(8) An appeals process for any dispute between the facility and a resident related
to rental charges, charges for services, or termination of a rental contract.
(9) Procedures for initial and annual resident screening as required by subsection
(d) of this section and procedures for the facility to make referrals of services
to residents.
(10) Contact information for the Division of Health Service Regulation Complaint
Intake Unit complaint hotline and the appropriate county department of social
services.
(11) Contact information for the owner or manager of the registered residential
facility as well as information on the number and type of staff available at the
facility and a schedule of on-site working hours at the facility.
The Division shall approve or disapprove the disclosure statement as a part of the registration
process. Upon approval of its disclosure statement and registration application, a registered
residential facility has a continuing duty to comply with the disclosure statement and is required
to notify the Division within 14 days after making any change to a disclosure statement approved
by the Division. The registered residential facility shall include the approved disclosure statement
as part of the resident's annual rental contract and shall ensure that the resident or the resident's
legal representative signs the approved disclosure statement on an annual basis.
(c) Agreement for Housing and Services. – The housing management of a registered
residential facility is required to have a financial interest, or financial affiliation, or formal written
Page 4 House Bill 813-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
agreement that makes personal care services accessible and available to residents through at least
one licensed home care or hospice agency. The housing management shall give each resident a
choice of any provider and keep charges for housing and personal care services separate. The
housing management shall ensure that all residents, or their compensatory agents, are capable,
through informed consent, of entering into a contract for housing and services.
(d) Resident Screening. – Each registered residential facility shall conduct an initial
screening of each resident prior to admission and then a follow-up screening at least once
annually. The purpose of the initial and annual screenings required by this subsection is to
identify a resident's need for assistance with activities of daily living, independent activities of
daily living, and any ancillary services needed to maintain the resident's safety, well-being, and
functional status. A registered residential facility shall make service referrals to each resident
based on that resident's screenings. A registered residential facility may assist a resident with
self-administration of medications if the assistance is provided by appropriately trained staff and
a licensed nurse has approved the delegation of medication assistance according to the home care
agency's established plan of care for the resident.
(e) Handling of Resident Funds Prohibited. – A registered residential facility and its
owners, agents, employees, and other persons affiliated with the registered residential facility are
prohibited from serving as a resident's legal representative or payee, or handling a resident's
funds.
(f) Employee Background Checks. – A registered residential facility is prohibited from
hiring or using as a volunteer any individual listed on the North Carolina Health Care Personnel
Registry established under G.S. 131E-256. A registered residential facility shall not hire any
employee prior to conducting a criminal history background check of the employee and shall not
refer any licensed home care or hospice agency to a resident prior to verifying that the licensed
home care or hospice agency conducts criminal history background checks of its employees.
(g) Adverse Action by the Division of Health Service Regulation. – The Division of
Health Service Regulation may deny, suspend, or revoke the registration of a registered
residential facility for any of the following reasons:
(1) Upon a determination by the Division that a facility is providing services that
require a license rather than registration.
(2) Upon a determination by the Division that a facility is not in compliance with
its approved disclosure statement.
(3) Upon a determination by the Division that a county department of social
services has substantiated a finding of abuse, neglect, or exploitation by a
facility. Any owner of a registered residential facility whose registration is
revoked by the Division under this subdivision is prohibited from registering
another registered residential facility or applying for a license to operate
another health care facility under this Chapter, Chapter 122C, Chapter 131E,
or Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes for a period of 60 months
following the date of the revocation.
Any facility wishing to contest the Division's actions under this subsection is entitled to an
administrative hearing as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 150B of the
General Statutes.
(h) Adverse Action by the Secretary. – The Secretary may deny, suspend, amend, or
revoke the registration of a registered residential facility, or suspend the admission of any new
residents to a registered residential facility, in any case in which the Secretary finds that there
has been a substantial failure to comply with this Part, any applicable rules adopted under this
Part, or any other applicable State laws or rules. Any facility wishing to contest the Secretary's
actions under this subsection is entitled to an administrative hearing as provided in the
Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
House Bill 813-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(i) Duty to Report Suspected Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation of Residents. – A
registered residential facility that knows or has cause to suspect that a resident is being abused,
neglected, or exploited shall report this information to local law enforcement, the North Carolina
Health Care Personnel Registry pursuant to G.S. 131E-256, and the appropriate county
department of social services in accordance with G.S. 108A-102.
(j) Complaint Inspections and Plans of Correction. – Each registered residential facility
registered under this Part is subject to inspection at all times by the Secretary to investigate
complaints filed with the Division against the facility alleging violations of this Part. A registered
residential facility shall permit the Division to inspect the premises and all facility and resident
records upon request. Within 15 working days after conducting an inspection authorized by this
subsection, the Division shall send a written report of its findings to the registered residential
facility. Within 10 working days after receipt of the Division's written report of findings, the
registered residential facility shall submit a plan of correction to the Division, based on the
written report of the findings, that describes steps the registered residential facility will take to
achieve and maintain compliance with the requirements of this Part. A registered residential
facility's failure to submit a plan of correction within the time period prescribed by this section
or failure to submit a plan of correction that is acceptable to the Division is grounds for the
Division to take adverse action on the registered residential facility's registration.
"§ 131D-2.3. Exemptions from licensure.
The following are excluded from this Article and are not required to be registered or obtain
licensure under this Article:
(1) Facilities licensed under Chapter 122C or Chapter 131E of the General
Statutes.
(2) Persons subject to rules of the Division of Employment and Independence for
People with Disabilities.
(3) Facilities that care for no more than four persons, all of whom are under the
supervision of the United States Veterans Administration.
(4) Facilities other than registered residential facilities that make no charges for
housing, amenities, or personal care service, either directly or indirectly.
(5) Institutions that are maintained or operated by a unit of government and that
were established, maintained, or operated by a unit of government and exempt
from licensure by the Department on September 30, 1995.
…
"§ 131D-2.5. License and registration fees.
…
(b) The Department shall charge each registered multiunit assisted housing with services
program residential facility a nonrefundable annual registration fee of three hundred fifty dollars
($350.00). Any individual or corporation that establishes, conducts, manages, or operates a
multiunit housing with services program, registered residential facility subject to registration
under this section, that fails to register is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and, upon conviction
shall be punishable only by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense and
not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each subsequent offense. Each day of a
continuing violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense.
"§ 131D-2.6. Legal action by Department.
(a) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the Department may,
in the manner provided by law, maintain an action in the name of the State for injunction or other
process against any person to restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, management, or
operation of (i) an adult care home without a license. license or (ii) a registered residential facility
without approved registration. Such action shall be instituted in the superior court of the county
in which any unlicensed activity has occurred or is occurring.
…."
Page 6 House Bill 813-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 143B-165 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-165. North Carolina Medical Care Commission – creation, powers and duties.
There is hereby created the North Carolina Medical Care Commission of the Department of
Health and Human Services with the power and duty to adopt rules to be followed in the
construction and maintenance of public and private hospitals, medical centers, and facilities
regulated under Chapters 131D and 131E of the General Statutes; to adopt, amend and rescind
rules under and not inconsistent with the laws of the State as necessary to carry out the provisions
and purposes of this Article; and to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the individuals
served by these facilities.
…
(14) The Commission shall adopt rules establishing standards for the following
with respect to facilities used as multiunit assisted housing with services,
registered residential facilities, as defined by Article 1 of Chapter 131D of the
General Statutes:
a. Registration and deregistration.
b. Disclosure statements.
c. Agreements for services.
d. Personnel requirements.
e. Resident admissions and discharges.
f. Inspections.
g. Approval, denial, revocation, or amendment of a facility's registration,
and suspension of admissions at a facility."
SECTION 2.(b) The Medical Care Commission may adopt emergency rules in
accordance with G.S. 150B-21.1A to implement this section with a reference to this subsection
as the basis for the adoption of those rules as emergency rules. Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1A(a), the Medical Care Commission shall not commence the adoption of
temporary rules pursuant to this subsection. Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-21.1A(d)(4), an
emergency rule adopted pursuant to this subsection expires on the earlier of January 1, 2027, or
the date the permanent rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission pursuant to
G.S. 143B-165(14), as amended by this act, become effective. The Department of Health and
Human Services shall notify the Revisor of Statutes when the permanent rules adopted pursuant
to G.S. 143B-165(14), as amended by this act, take effect.
SECTION 3. Effective January 1, 2026, G.S. 131E-256(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) For the purpose of this section, the following are considered to be "health care
facilities":
(1) Adult Care Homes as defined in G.S. 131D-2.1.
(2) Hospitals as defined in G.S. 131E-76.
(3) Home Care Agencies as defined in G.S. 131E-136.
(4) Nursing Pools as defined by G.S. 131E-154.2.
(5) Hospices as defined by G.S. 131E-201.
(6) Nursing Facilities as defined by G.S. 131E-255.
(7) State-Operated Facilities as defined in G.S. 122C-3(14)f.
(8) Residential Facilities as defined in G.S. 122C-3(14)e.
(9) 24-Hour Facilities as defined in G.S. 122C-3(14)g.
(10) Licensable Facilities as defined in G.S. 122C-3(14)b.
(11) Multiunit Assisted Housing with Services Registered residential facilities as
defined in G.S. 131D-2.1.
(12) Community-Based Providers of Services for the Mentally Ill, the
Developmentally Disabled, and Substance Abusers that are not required to be
licensed under Article 2 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.
House Bill 813-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(13) Agencies providing in-home aide services funded through the Home and
Community Care Block Grant Program in accordance with
G.S. 143B-181.1(a)11."
SECTION 4. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Service Regulation, the sum
of three hundred fifty-five thousand two hundred fourteen dollars ($355,214) in recurring funds
for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to fund three full-time equivalent Facility
Compliance Consultant I positions dedicated to the Division of Health Service Regulation to
assist with the registration and inspection of registered residential facilities pursuant to Part 1 of
Article 1 of Chapter 131D of the General Statutes, as amended by Section 1 of this act; and the
sum of eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
to purchase equipment, supplies, and other nonrecurring expenses associated with these new
positions.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 8 House Bill 813-First Edition